Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-2401
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-2401 to 85-2428 shall be known and may be cited as the Postsecondary Institution Act.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB512, § 28.